3rdParty/snowball/algorithms/serbian.sbl
            'lu{cx}ili'
            'lu{cx}ile'
            'lu{cx}ena'
            'lu{cx}eno'
            'lu{cx}eni'
            'lu{cx}ene'
            'lu{cx}uj'
            'lu{cx}io'
            'lu{cx}en'
            'lu{cx}im'
            'lu{cx}i{sx}'
            'lu{cx}it'
            'lu{cx}ih'
            'lu{cx}e'
            'lu{cx}i'       (<-'lu{cx}')
            'jetismo'
            'jetiste'
            'jeti{sx}e'
            'jetimo'
            'jetite'
            'jetiti'
            'jetili'
            'jetila'
            'jetilo'
            'jetile'
            'jetim'
            'jeti{sx}'
            'jetit'
            'jetih'
            'jetio'         (<-'jeti')
            'emo'
            'em'
            'e{sx}'
            'elama'
            'el'            (<-'e')
            'ilama'
            'ilima'
            'ilom'
            'il'            (<-'i')
            'atijega'
            'atijemu'
            'atijima'
            'atijeg'
            'atijem'
            'atega'
            'atemu'
            'ateg'
            'atem'
            'atijih'
            'atijim'
            'atima'
            'atoga'
            'atome'
            'atomu'
            'atiji'
            'atije'
            'atija'
            'atiju'
            'atoj'
            'atog'
            'atom'
            'atim'
            'atih'
            'ata'
            'atu'
            'ato'           (<-'at')
            'etav{sx}i'
            'etu{cy}i'
            'etemo'
            'etimo'
            'etem'
            'ete{sx}'       (<-'et')
            'lucujuci'
            'lucujemo'
            'lucujete'
            'lucujem'
            'lucujes'
            'lucujmo'
            'lucujte'
            'lucismo'
            'luciste'
            'luciti'
            'lucite'
            'lucise'
            'lucuje'
            'lucuju'
            'lucila'
            'lucile'
            'lucili'
            'lucilo'
            'lucena'
            'luceni'
            'lucene'
            'luceno'
            'lucimo'
            'lucim'
            'lucis'
            'lucih'
            'lucit'
            'lucio'
            'lucuj'
            'lucen'
            'luce'
            'luci'          (no_diacritics <-'luc')
            'snjijima'
            'snjijemu'
            'snjijega'
            'snjijim'
            'snjijih'
            'snjijeg'
            'snjijoj'
            'snjiji'
            'snjija'
            'snjije'
            'snjiju'
            'snjima'
            'snjemu'
            'snjomu'
            'snjome'
            'snjega'
            'snjoga'
            'snjih'
            'snjim'
            'snjem'
            'snjom'
            'snjeg'
            'snjog'
            'snjoj'
            'snja'
            'snje'
            'snji'
            'snjo'
            'snju'          (no_diacritics <-'snj')
            'osijima'
            'osijemu'
            'osijega'
            'snjijem'
            'osijih'
            'osijim'
            'osijem'
            'osijeg'
            'osijoj'
            'osima'
            'osemu'
            'osomu'
            'osome'
            'osega'
            'osoga'
            'osija'
            'osije'
            'osiji'
            'osiju'
            'osih'
            'osim'
            'osem'
            'osom'
            'oseg'
            'osog'
            'osoj'
            'osa'
            'ose'
            'osi'
            'osu'           (no_diacritics <-'os')
            'acismo'
            'aciste'
            'acima'
            'acimo'
            'acome'
            'acomu'
            'acite'
            'aciti'
            'acise'
            'acila'
            'acile'
            'acili'
            'acilo'
            'acega'
            'acene'
            'aceci'
            'aceni'
            'acemu'
            'acena'
            'aceno'
            'acoga'
            'acoj'
            'acih'
            'acem'
            'acom'
            'acen'
            'acog'
            'acit'
            'acio'
            'aceg'
            'acim'
            'acuh'
            'acis'
            'ace'
            'aca'
            'aci'           (no_diacritics <-'ac')
            'ecome'
            'ecoga'
            'ecemu'
            'ecima'
            'ecega'
            'ecomu'
            'ecoj'
            'ecuh'
            'ecom'
            'ecog'
            'eceg'
            'ecih'
            'ecem'
            'ecim'
            'eca'
            'ece'           (no_diacritics <-'ec')
            'ucomu'
            'ucome'
            'ucima'
            'ucoga'
            'ucega'
            'ucemu'
            'ucih'
            'ucog'
            'uceg'
            'ucom'
            'ucem'
            'ucim'
            'ucuh'
            'ucoj'
            'uca'
            'uce'           (no_diacritics <-'uc')
            'rosismo'
            'rosivsi'
            'rosiste'
            'rositi'
            'rosili'
            'rosise'
            'rosite'
            'rosilo'
            'rosimo'
            'rosile'
            'rosila'
            'rosit'
            'rosis'
            'rosio'
            'rosim'
            'rosih'         (no_diacritics <-'rosi')
            'acavsi'
            'acaste'
            'acasmo'
            'acaju'
            'acane'
            'acate'
            'acali'
            'acani'
            'acati'
            'acale'
            'acahu'
            'acase'
            'acano'
            'acamo'
            'acalo'
            'acana'
            'acala'
            'acam'
            'acan'
            'acao'
            'acas'
            'acat'
            'acah'          (no_diacritics <-'aca')
            'jasima'
            'jasama'
            'jasem'
            'jasom'
            'jase'
            'jasi'
            'jasa'
            'jasu'          (no_diacritics <-'jas')
            'tasima'
            'tasama'
            'tasem'
            'tasom'
            'tase'
            'tasa'
            'tasu'
            'tasi'          (no_diacritics <-'tas')
            'gasima'
            'gasama'
            'gasem'
            'gasom'
            'gasi'
            'gasu'
            'gase'
            'gasa'          (no_diacritics <-'gas')
            'nasama'
            'nasima'
            'nasem'
            'nasom'
            'nasu'
            'nasi'
            'nase'
            'nasa'          (no_diacritics <-'nas')
            'kasama'
            'kasima'
            'kasom'
            'kasem'
            'kasi'
            'kasu'
            'kase'
            'kasa'          (no_diacritics <-'kas')
            'vasama'
            'vasima'
            'vasom'
            'vasem'
            'vasi'
            'vase'
            'vasa'
            'vasu'          (no_diacritics <-'vas')
            'basama'
            'basima'
            'basom'
            'basem'
            'basi'
            'base'
            'basu'
            'basa'          (no_diacritics <-'bas')
            'astuci'
            'astes'         (no_diacritics <-'as')
            'cinima'
            'cinome'
            'cinama'
            'cinomu'
            'cinoga'
            'cinom'
            'cinih'
            'cinim'
            'cinog'
            'cinoj'
            'cino'
            'cini'
            'cinu'
            'cine'
            'cina'          (no_diacritics <-'cin')
            'astajase'
            'astajuci'
            'astajes'       (no_diacritics <-'astaj')
            'istajase'
            'istajuci'
            'istajes'       (no_diacritics <-'istaj')
            'ostajase'
            'ostajuci'
            'ostajes'       (no_diacritics <-'ostaj')
            'astadose'
            'astades'
            'astanes'
            'astavsi'       (no_diacritics <-'asta')
            'istadose'
            'istades'
            'istanes'
            'istavsi'       (no_diacritics <-'ista')
            'ostadose'
            'ostades'
            'ostanes'
            'ostavsi'       (no_diacritics <-'osta')
            'avajuci'
            'avase'
            'avas'          (no_diacritics <-'ava')
            'evajuci'
            'evase'
            'evas'          (no_diacritics <-'eva')
            'ivajuci'
            'ivase'
            'ivas'          (no_diacritics <-'iva')
            'uvajuci'
            'uvase'
            'uvas'          (no_diacritics <-'uva')
            'ovase'         (no_diacritics <-'ova')
            'jetise'
            'jetis'         (no_diacritics <-'jeti')
            'injase'
            'injes'         (no_diacritics <-'inj')
            'istem'         (no_diacritics <-'ist')
            'esama'
            'esem'
            'esi'           (no_diacritics <-'es')
            'etavsi'
            'etuci'
            'etes'          (no_diacritics <-'et')
            'isama'
            'isem'
            'isi'           (no_diacritics <-'is')
            'irajuci'
            'irujuci'
            'irujes'
            'iravsi'
            'irase'
            'iras'          (no_diacritics <-'ir')
            'urajuci'
            'urase'
            'uras'          (no_diacritics <-'ur')
            'ujuci'
            'ujes'          (no_diacritics <-'uj')
            'nivsi'
            'nis'           (no_diacritics <-'ni')
            'snega'
            'snemu'
            'snem'
            'sneg'          (no_diacritics <-'sn')
            'tavsi'
            'tas'           (no_diacritics <-'ta')
            'ajuci'
            'avsi'
            'ase'
            'as'            (no_diacritics <-'a')
            'ijes'
            'ivsi'
            'ieci'
            'is'            (no_diacritics <-'i')
            'es'            (no_diacritics <-'e')
            'nuvsi'
            'nuci'
            'nes'           (no_diacritics <-'n')
        )
    )

    define Step_3 as (
        [substring] R1 among (
            'enom'
            'enoj'
            'enog'
            'enim'
            'enih'
            'anoj'
            'anog'
            'anim'
            'anih'
            'ost'
            'eno'
            'eni'
            'oga'
            'ima'
            'enu'
            'ena'
            'ama'
            'ano'
            'ani'
            'om'
            'og'
            'u'
            'o'
            'i'
            'e'
            'a'             (<-'')
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    do cyr_to_lat
    do prelude
    do mark_regions
    backwards (
        do Step_1
        do (Step_2 or Step_3)
    )
)
